Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-103.6 Personal injury protection
benefits tied to prepaid health care plan for description of coverage only. (a)
The benefits provided under section 431:10C-103.5 shall be substantially
comparable to the requirements for prepaid health care plans, as provided in
chapter 393 and rules of the department of labor and industrial relations,
pertaining to the Prepaid Health Care Act. The reference to the Prepaid Health
Care Act is only for purposes of describing the coverages and exclusions, without
regard to any specific insurer or plan, and shall not be construed to transfer
coverage to the prepaid health care plans. The precise charges and utilization
rates shall be as contained in the workers' compensation schedules as provided
under section 431:10C-308.5, unless modified by the commissioner by rule under
chapter 91.

(b) Chiropractic treatments shall be allowed
for not more than the lesser of the following:

(1) Thirty visits at no more than $75 a visit, plus
no more than five x-rays at no more than $50 each; or

(2) Treatment as defined by the Hawaii State
Chiropractic Association guidelines in effect on January 25, 1997.

(c) Acupuncture treatments shall be allowed
for no more than thirty visits at no more than $75 a visit.

(d) Naturopathic treatments shall be allowed
for no more than thirty visits at no more than $75 a visit.

(e) The combined total of naturopathic,
chiropractic, and acupuncture treatments may not exceed thirty visits.

(f) The benefits under section 431:10C-103.5
may be with copayment, and shall be subject to and apply the utilization
requirements applicable under prepaid health care plans, under chapter 393. [L
1997, c 251, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 275, §6; am L 2004, c 56, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next